Illinois, session 104th, SB2387.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Agricultural Land Conservation Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and intent. The General Assembly 7hereby reiterates the legislative findings and statement of 8intent set forth in Section 2 of the Farmland Preservation Act 9and further finds that:10        (1) According to the United States Department of 11    Agriculture Economic Research Service, between 2012 and 12    2020 in the Midwest, 70% of solar projects and 94% of wind 13    projects were located on agricultural land.14        (2) Each year in Illinois, thousands of acres of 15    agricultural land are rezoned and developed into 16    industrial, commercial, and residential areas.17        (3) Soil and Water Conversation Districts are units of 18    local government; however, they have no taxing authority.19        (4) Soil and Water Conversation District employees 20    serve as the critical infrastructure in every county in 21    Illinois, administering vital State and federal 22    conservation programs. They are on the front lines of 23    addressing pressing environmental challenges, including   SB2387- 2 -LRB104 12209 BDA 22314 b1    improving water quality, enhancing soil health, and 2    building resilience to the increasingly severe impacts of 3    climate change. Their work is foundational to achieving 4    environmental goals, and their presence on the ground 5    ensures that these efforts reach the necessary scale.6        (5) Unstable or intermittent funding threatens to 7    undermine the capacity of Soil and Water Conversation 8    Districts to deliver programs that support farmers, 9    landowners, and communities across the State. Without 10    adequate staffing, Illinois risks losing the ability to 11    put federal funds earmarked for conservation and climate 12    resilience onto the ground in Illinois. Moreover, it puts 13    at risk the progress made in addressing water quality 14    issues, mitigating flooding, and improving soil 15    sustainability. 16    Section 10. Agricultural land; defined. In this Act, 17"agricultural land" means land that is intensively used and 18managed for the production of food and fiber. "Agricultural 19land" includes cropland; hay land; pastures, including native 20pastures and rangeland; orchards; vineyards; areas which 21support wetland crops; other lands used to support the 22production of livestock; and small tree farms. 23    Section 15. Farmland Conversion Fee Fund. The Farmland 24Conversion Fee Fund is created as a special fund in the State   SB2387- 3 -LRB104 12209 BDA 22314 b1treasury. Revenue generated from Farmland Conversion Fees 2under Section 20 shall be collected by the Department of 3Revenue and deposited into the Fund. Moneys from the Fund may 4be expended and distributed by the Department of Agriculture 5for the following purposes and no other purpose:6        (1) supporting healthy soil, clean water, and climate 7    smart agricultural practice programs, and education;8        (2) supporting operations funding for Soil and Water 9    Conservation Districts;10        (3) associated administrative costs for administering 11    the Act;12        (4) any other purpose expressly provided under this 13    Act or rules adopted under this Act.14    Annually, the Department of Agriculture shall ensure that, 15subject to moneys in the Fund, before expending moneys for any 16other purpose, (i) at least $17,500,000 is distributed to Soil 17and Water Conservation Districts for the purposes under 18paragraph (2) of this Section, annually adjusted by the 19percentage change in the consumer price index-u of the 20preceding year; (ii) exactly $2,000,000 is distributed to the 21Department of Labor, annually adjusted by the percentage 22change in the consumer price index-u of the preceding year; 23and (iii) exactly $1,000,000 is distributed to the Department 24of Revenue for administrative and other costs associated with 25collection of the Farmland Conversion Fees under Section 20 26and related activities. Any remainder, subject to moneys in   SB2387- 4 -LRB104 12209 BDA 22314 b1the Fund, may be expended by the Department of Agriculture 2according to the purposes enumerated in this Section. In this 3Section, "consumer price index-u" means the index published by 4the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department 5of Labor that measures the average change in prices of goods 6and services purchased by all urban consumers, United States 7city average, all items, 1982-84 = 100. 8    Section 20. Farmland Conversion Fees.9    (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, a Farmland Conversion Fee 10shall be paid by the buyer or lessee in a transaction for any 11agricultural land that will be removed from production for the 12specific purpose of developing a solar farm, a wind farm, an 13industrial park, a commercial area, a single-family or 14multiple-family dwelling or for being put to any other use 15that removes the agricultural land from production. This 16Farmland Conversion Fee shall apply to agricultural land that 17is leased or purchased. This Farmland Conversion Fee shall be 18remitted to the Department of Revenue according to rule of the 19Department of Revenue within 30 days of the purchase or lease 20of the agricultural land by the buyer or lessee. The fee 21schedule established under this Section shall be based on a 223-tier system as follows:23        (1) For removal of up to 10 acres of agricultural 24    land, the Farmland Conversion Fee shall be $900 per acre.25        (2) For removal of more than 10 acres but less than 30   SB2387- 5 -LRB104 12209 BDA 22314 b1    acres of agricultural land, the Farmland Conversion Fee 2    shall be $800 per acre.3        (3) For removal of 30 or more acres of agricultural 4    land, the Farmland Conversion Fee shall be $700 per acre.5    (b) Revenue from Farmland Conversion Fees shall be 6collected by the Department of Revenue and deposited into the 7Farmland Conversion Fee Fund.8    (c) Conversion of agricultural land that will be removed 9from production is exempt from the Farmland Conversion Fee if 10it is removed from production for the personal use of a farmer 11or landowner or if it is one or more of the following types of 12agricultural land conversion:13        (1) any conversion of land in which the primary 14    function of the converted area supports agricultural 15    infrastructure, such as livestock operations or grain 16    elevators;17        (2) any conversion of land done by a State agency; 18        (3) any conversion of land done for the creation of 19    high-voltage transmission systems; or20        (4) any conversion of land whose primary purpose is 21    the establishment of conservation practices.22    (d) The Department of Revenue shall adopt rules to 23implement this Section. 24    Section 25. State agricultural property. All State real 25property being used in the commercial production of   SB2387- 6 -LRB104 12209 BDA 22314 b1agricultural commodities, including any real property under 2lease agreements with the Department of Natural Resources, 3shall use an established metric for the purpose of advancing 4adoption of conservation practices, including, but not limited 5to, the following:6        (1) cover crops;7        (2) no till;8        (3) strip till;9        (4) nutrient management plans;10        (5) saturated buffers;11        (6) bioreactor terraces;12        (7) contours;13        (8) grass filter strips;14        (9) riparian buffers;15        (10) grassed waterways;16        (11) pollinator plantings;17        (12) windbreaks;18        (13) constructed wetlands;19        (14) tile drainage water that is collected and sampled 20    for water quality;21        (15) conservation plans that reduce sheet and rill 22    erosion; and23        (16) nitrogen rate studies. 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.